Arkansas, session 2025, SB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-66-310(c), concerning excess fees
charged for insurance by a licensed property or casualty agent or broker, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Nothing shall prohibit a duly licensed property or casualty
agent or broker or surplus lines broker from charging a fee to the insured in
addition to the premium properly charged for a policy or contract according
to the insurer's rate and rule filings with the State Insurance Department,
provided that:
(1)(A) Each such fee is separately disclosed on the
invoice or billing statement mailed or delivered to the insured; and
(2)(B)(i) The aggregate sum of the fees and all producers'
commissions or other compensation due and owing for that policy or contract
does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total gross premium charged the
*ANS093*
01/16/2025 9:58:39 AM ANS093

SB76
insured by the insurer for that policy or contract.
(ii) If a licensed property or casualty agent or
broker refers a risk to a surplus lines broker licensed under § 23-65-308,
then subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section does not apply.
(2) The fee under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be
reasonable in relation to the cost of underwriting, issuing, and processing
the policy or contract.





























01/16/2025 9:58:39 AM ANS093